District of Columbia statutes.
47-115

Deputy Disbursing Officer and assistant disbursing officers — Liability for misconduct; bond.

The Deputy Disbursing Officer and the several assistant disbursing officers shall each be subject, for his official misconduct, to all liabilities and penalties prescribed by law in like cases for the Disbursing Officer, District of Columbia; and the Deputy Disbursing Officer and each assistant disbursing officer shall give bond to the United States for the benefit of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Mayor of the District of Columbia, and the Disbursing Officer, District of Columbia, conditioned for the faithful performance of the duties of each of their offices in the disbursing and accounting, according to law, for all moneys of the United States and of the District of Columbia that may come into his hands, which bond shall be in the amount required by the Council of the District of Columbia, but to be not less than $25,000, and to be subject to approval by the Mayor and the Secretary of the Treasury and to be filed in the office of the Secretary of the Treasury.

July 30, 1951, 65 Stat. 127, ch. 250, § 3
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
1981 Ed., § 47-115.
1973 Ed., § 47-113c.
Disbursing Office abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-111.